Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3230.01
Natural resources districts; construction; approval of other special-purpose district affected.

A natural resources district having within, or partially within its boundary, the irrigation service area of an operational irrigation district, reclamation district, or public power and irrigation district, shall, prior to construction of any project within such irrigation service area that would have a direct effect upon the conveyance, distribution, use, recovery, reuse and drainage of water, obtain approval of such project by the governing board of the irrigation district, reclamation district or public power and irrigation district whose irrigation service area is so affected.

Laws 1971, LB 626, § 3.